ces-rus_present/apertium/apertium-ces/apertium-ces.ces.dix
    <pardef n="/to__det">
      <e><p><l>ten</l><r>to<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ten</l><r>to<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ta</l><r>to<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>to</l><r>to<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>toho</l><r>to<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>toho</l><r>to<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>té</l><r>to<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>toho</l><r>to<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tomu</l><r>to<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tomu</l><r>to<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>té</l><r>to<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tomu</l><r>to<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>toho</l><r>to<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ten</l><r>to<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tu</l><r>to<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>to</l><r>to<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tím</l><r>to<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tím</l><r>to<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tou</l><r>to<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tím</l><r>to<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tom</l><r>to<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tom</l><r>to<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>té</l><r>to<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tom</l><r>to<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
         
    <!-- Plurals --><e><p><l>ti</l><r>to<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ty</l><r>to<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ty</l><r>to<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ta</l><r>to<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>těch</l><r>to<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>těch</l><r>to<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>těch</l><r>to<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>těch</l><r>to<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>těm</l><r>to<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>těm</l><r>to<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>těm</l><r>to<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>těm</l><r>to<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ty</l><r>to<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ty</l><r>to<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ty</l><r>to<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ta</l><r>to<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>těmi</l><r>to<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>těmi</l><r>to<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>těmi</l><r>to<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>těmi</l><r>to<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>těch</l><r>to<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>těch</l><r>to<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>těch</l><r>to<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>těch</l><r>to<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     

    <e lm="to"><i></i><par n="/to__det"/></e>
    <e lm="tamto"><i>tam</i><par n="/to__det"/></e>
